Washington statutes.
RCW 43.334.060

Director's delegation of powers and duties.

Any power or duty vested in or transferred to the director by law or executive order may be delegated by the director to the deputy director or to any other assistant or subordinate; but the director is responsible for the official acts of the officers and employees of the department.

[ 2005 c 333 s 6.]